cs: Typ sklíčidla/adaptéru: Klíč; Bez klíče; SDS; SDS max; SDS plus; SDS top; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta glave alata: Ključ; Bez ključa; SDS; SDS Max; SDS Plus; SDS Top; Ostalo
de: Futtertyp: Schlüssel; Schlüssellos; SDS; SDS max; SDS plus; SDS top; Sonstiges
zh-CN: 卡盘类型: 钥匙; 无钥匙; SDS; 最大 SDS; SDS +; SDS 顶部; 其他
pl: Typ uchwytu: Klucz; Bez kluczyka; SDS; SDS max; SDS plus; SDS top; Inne
lt-LT: Griebtuvo tipas: Raktinis; Beraktis; SDS; „SDS Max“; „SDS Plus“; „SDS Top“; Kita
nb: Borholdertype: Nøkkel; Nøkkelløs; SDS; SDS-maks; SDS pluss; SDS topp; Annet
ko: 척 유형: 열쇠; 키레스; SDS; SDS max; SDS plus; SDS top; 기타
th: ประเภทหัวจับ: กุญแจ; ไม่ใช้จำปา; SDS; SDS Max; SDS Plus; SDS Top; อื่นๆ
tr: Ayna Tipi: Anahtar; Anahtarsız; SDS; SDS maksimum; SDS artı; SDS üst; Diğer
sk-SK: Typ skľučovadla: Kľúč; Bezkľúčový; SDS; SDS max; SDS plus; Vrchná časť SDS; Iné
it: Tipo di mandrino: Chiave; Senza chiave; SDS; SDS max; SDS plus; SDS top; Altro
ro-RO: Tip mandrină: Cheie; Fără cheie; SDS; SDS max; SDS plus; SDS top; Altele
sv: Chucktyp: Nyckel; Nyckellös; SDS; SDS max; SDS plus; SDS top; Övrigt
ru: Тип патрона: Ключ; Без ключа; SDS; SDS max; SDS plus; SDS top; Другое
hu: Tokmány típusa: Tokmánykulcs; Gyorsszorító; SDS; SDS Max; SDS Plus; SDS Top; Egyéb
zh-TW: 卡盤類型: 鑰匙; 免鑰匙; SDS; SDS max; SDS plus; SDS top; 其他
nl: Boorhoudertype: Sleutel; Sleutelloos; SDS; SDS-max; SDS-plus; SDS-top; Andere
fr: Type de mandrin: Clé; Sans clé; SDS; FDS maximum; FDS plus; Haut FDS; Autre
da: Skæretype: Nøgle; Nøglefri; SDS; SDS maks.; SDS plus; SDS top; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de mandril: Chave; Sem chave; SDS; SDS max; SDS plus; SDS top; Outro
en: Chuck type: Key; Keyless; SDS; SDS max; SDS plus; SDS top; Other
fi: Istukkatyyppi: Avain; Avaimeton; SDS; SDS max; SDS plus; SDS top; Muu
ja: チャックタイプ: キー; キーレス; SDS; SDS max; SDS plus; SDS top; その他
sl-SI: Vrsta vpenjalne glave: Ključ; Brez ključa; SDS; SDS max; SDS plus; SDS top; Drugo
el: Τύπος τσοκ: Με κλειδί; Χωρίς κλειδί; SDS; SDS max; SDS plus; SDS top; Άλλο
es: Tipo de mandril: Llave; Sin llave; SDS; SDS máx; SDS plus; SDS top; Otros
vi: Loại đầu kẹp mũi khoan: Chìa khóa; Không cần chìa khóa; SDS; SDS max; SDS plus; SDS top; Khác
bg-BG: Тип патронник: Ключ; Без ключ; SDS; SDS max; SDS plus; SDS top; Други
pt-PT: Tipo de mandril: Chave; Sem chave; SDS; SDS Max; SDS Plus; SDS Top; Outro